Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Use of resident EBT cards by program staff. new text end new text begin For a staff person at a licensed residential program to make food purchases on behalf of a program resident using the resident's electronic benefit transfer (EBT) card, the staff person must be listed as an authorized representative of the resident. A residential program must maintain a log of purchases made by program staff using a resident's EBT card and must retain a record of purchases made under this subdivision according to section 245A.041. new text end